District of Columbia statutes.
10-501.02

Authority to make rules and regulations.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia and the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army are authorized and empowered to make all needful rules and regulations for the government and proper care of all the property placed in the charge of the Mayor of the District of Columbia and the Chief of Engineers and under their respective control by the provisions of § 10-501.01 and to annex such reasonable penalties to said rules and regulations as will secure their enforcement; and also the Council and the Chief of Engineers are authorized and empowered to make, and the Mayor and the Chief of Engineers to enforce, rules and regulations in regard to building and repairing wharves, the rental thereof, and the rate of wharfage. All rents so collected shall be covered into the Treasury of the United States, to be placed to the credit of the United States and to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

(b)

The wharfage fee is $25 per day.

History

Mar. 3, 1899, 30 Stat. 1378, ch. 458, § 2
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1602, 49 DCR 11664
Mar. 11, 2009, 123 Stat. 700, Pub. L. 111-8,§ 823

Cross References

Harbor regulations, see §§ 22-4401 to 22-4403.
Metropolitan Police, enforcement of regulations for harbor, see § 5-105.05.
Rental of fish wharf, see § 37-205.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-102.
1973 Ed., § 9-102.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-307 designated the existing text as subsection (a); and added subsec. (b).
Pub. L. 111-8, in subsec. (a), deleted the last sentence, which had read as follows: “ No lease made under the provisions of said § 10-501.01 shall extend beyond the period of 10 years.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(187) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.